North Carolina, session 2025, HB994.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the National
Institute of Minority Economic Development (Institute), a nonprofit corporation, twenty million
three hundred thousand dollars ($20,300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to be used by the Institute as follows:
(1) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to provide programming support
for three women's business centers that provide technical support and capacity
building in western North Carolina, the Triad, and the Piedmont.
(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to Community Development Corporations
(CDC), and to communities without CDCs, to expand community economic
development services.
(3) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to be used to assist residents in western
North Carolina whose primary residence was damaged because of Hurricane
Helene with long-term residential housing recovery efforts.
(4) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the Institute Capital (I-CAP) institution
for funding activities in the State.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the National
Institute of Minority Economic Development (Institute), a nonprofit corporation, one million
dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used by the Institute
to (i) assist with housing recovery efforts in western North Carolina, (ii) provide State match
funding for federal disaster-recovery State match requirements, and (iii) provide technical
assistance and community development services in other parts of the State.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H994-v-1*